California, session 20252026, SB1404.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Reinstating the fire prevention fee ensures dedicated, sustainable funding for fire prevention in state responsibility areas, reducing risk to residents.(b) Funding supports proactive forest management and vegetation treatments designed to reduce the severity of wildfires, allowing forests within state responsibility areas to better withstand ignition and reducing the intensity of wildfire behavior.(c) Revenue allows for updated fire hazard severity mapping and the development of comprehensive emergency evacuation plans, providing homeowners with essential information to improve household safety.(d) Fees provide vital grants to local fire safe councils and community conservation corps for fire prevention projects, augmenting the ability of local fire agencies to manage risks in the wildland-urban interface.(e) Funding sustains fire prevention education programs for residents and supports fire-related law enforcement activities, including arson investigations and fire cause determinations, which are essential for reducing wildfires caused by humans.SEC. 2.Section 4213.05 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:4213.05.(a)The fire prevention fee imposed pursuant to Section 4212 shall be reinstated, effective January 1, 2027. Any moneys held in the State Responsibility Area Fire Prevention Fund shall be appropriated by the Legislature in a manner consistent with subdivision (d) of Section 4214.(b)It is the intent of the Legislature that moneys derived from the auction or sale of allowances pursuant to a market-based compliance mechanism established pursuant to Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code shall be used to replace the moneys that would have otherwise been collected pursuant to Section 4212 from July 1, 2017, to January 1, 2027, inclusive, to continue fire prevention activities.(c)The amount appropriated in the annual Budget Act pursuant to subdivision (b) shall not be included in determining the amount of annual proceeds of the fund for purposes of the calculations in Section 39719 of the Health and Safety Code.SEC. 2. Section 4213.05 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:4213.05. (a) Commencing with the 2017–18 fiscal year, the fire prevention fee imposed pursuant to Section 4212 shall be suspended, effective July 1, 2017. 2017, to January 1, 2027, inclusive. Any moneys held in reserve in the State Responsibility Area Fire Prevention Fund shall be appropriated by the Legislature in a manner consistent with subdivision (d) of Section 4214.(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that moneys derived from the auction or sale of allowances pursuant to a market-based compliance mechanism established pursuant to Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code shall be used to replace the moneys that would have otherwise been collected under Section 4212 to continue fire prevention activities. activities from January 1, 2017, until January 1, 2028, inclusive.(c) The amount appropriated in the annual Budget Act pursuant to subdivision (b) shall not be included in determining the amount of annual proceeds of the fund for purposes of the calculations in Section 39719 of the Health and Safety Code.(d)This section shall become inoperative on January 1, 2031.SEC. 3. Article 3 (commencing with Section 4229) of Chapter 1.5 of Part 2 of Division 4 of the Public Resources Code is repealed.